motorola-external-hunspell/motorola/external/hunspell/dicts/it_IT/it_IT.aff
PFX T Y 148
PFX T 0 l' [aeiouhAEIOUH]
PFX T a l'A a
PFX T e l'E e
PFX T i l'I i
PFX T o l'O o
PFX T u l'U u
PFX T h l'H h
PFX T 0 L' [AEIOUH]
PFX T a L'A a
PFX T e L'E e
PFX T i L'I i
PFX T o L'O o
PFX T u L'U u
PFX T h L'H h
PFX T 0 all' [aeiouhAEIOUH]
PFX T a all'A a
PFX T e all'E e
PFX T i all'I i
PFX T o all'O o
PFX T u all'U u
PFX T h all'H h
PFX T 0 All' [AEIOUH]
PFX T a All'A a
PFX T e All'E e
PFX T i All'I i
PFX T o All'O o
PFX T u All'U u
PFX T h All'H h
PFX T 0 ALL' [AEIOUH][QWERTYUIOPLKJHGFDSAZXCVBNM]
PFX T 0 dell' [aeiouhAEIOUH]
PFX T a dell'A a
PFX T e dell'E e
PFX T i dell'I i
PFX T o dell'O o
PFX T u dell'U u
PFX T h dell'H h
PFX T 0 Dell' [AEIOUH]
PFX T a Dell'A a
PFX T e Dell'E e
PFX T i Dell'I i
PFX T o Dell'O o
PFX T u Dell'U u
PFX T h Dell'H h
PFX T 0 DELL' [AEIOUH][QWERTYUIOPLKJHGFDSAZXCVBNM]
PFX T 0 dall' [aeiouhAEIOUH]
PFX T a dall'A a
PFX T e dall'E e
PFX T i dall'I i
PFX T o dall'O o
PFX T u dall'U u
PFX T h dall'H h
PFX T 0 Dall' [AEIOUH]
PFX T a Dall'A a
PFX T e Dall'E e
PFX T i Dall'I i
PFX T o Dall'O o
PFX T u Dall'U u
PFX T h Dall'H h
PFX T 0 DALL' [AEIOUH][QWERTYUIOPLKJHGFDSAZXCVBNM]
PFX T 0 nell' [aeiouhAEIOUH]
PFX T a nell'A a
PFX T e nell'E e
PFX T i nell'I i
PFX T o nell'O o
PFX T u nell'U u
PFX T h nell'H h
PFX T 0 Nell' [AEIOUH]
PFX T a Nell'A a
PFX T e Nell'E e
PFX T i Nell'I i
PFX T o Nell'O o
PFX T u Nell'U u
PFX T h Nell'H h
PFX T 0 NELL' [AEIOUH][QWERTYUIOPLKJHGFDSAZXCVBNM]
PFX T 0 sull' [aeiouhAEIOUH]
PFX T a sull'A a
PFX T e sull'E e
PFX T i sull'I i
PFX T o sull'O o
PFX T u sull'U u
PFX T h sull'H h
PFX T 0 Sull' [AEIOUH]
PFX T a Sull'A a
PFX T e Sull'E e
PFX T i Sull'I i
PFX T o Sull'O o
PFX T u Sull'U u
PFX T h Sull'H h
PFX T 0 SULL' [AEIOUH][QWERTYUIOPLKJHGFDSAZXCVBNM]
PFX T 0 coll' [aeiouhAEIOUH]
PFX T a coll'A a
PFX T e coll'E e
PFX T i coll'I i
PFX T o coll'O o
PFX T u coll'U u
PFX T h coll'H h
PFX T 0 Coll' [AEIOUH]
PFX T a Coll'A a
PFX T e Coll'E e
PFX T i Coll'I i
PFX T o Coll'O o
PFX T u Coll'U u
PFX T h Coll'H h
PFX T 0 COLL' [AEIOUH][QWERTYUIOPLKJHGFDSAZXCVBNM]
PFX T 0 d' [aeiouhAEIOUH]
PFX T a d'A a
PFX T e d'E e
PFX T i d'I i
PFX T o d'O o
PFX T u d'U u
PFX T h d'H h
PFX T 0 D' [AEIOUH]
PFX T a D'A a
PFX T e D'E e
PFX T i D'I i
PFX T o D'O o
PFX T u D'U u
PFX T h D'H h
PFX T 0 quest' [aeiouhAEIOUH]
PFX T a quest'A a
PFX T e quest'E e
PFX T i quest'I i
PFX T o quest'O o
PFX T u quest'U u
PFX T h quest'H h
PFX T 0 Quest' [AEIOUH]
PFX T a Quest'A a
PFX T e Quest'E e
PFX T i Quest'I i
PFX T o Quest'O o
PFX T u Quest'U u
PFX T h Quest'H h
PFX T 0 QUEST' [AEIOUH][QWERTYUIOPLKJHGFDSAZXCVBNM]
PFX T 0 quell' [aeiouhAEIOUH]
PFX T a quell'A a
PFX T e quell'E e
PFX T i quell'I i
PFX T o quell'O o
PFX T u quell'U u
PFX T h quell'H h
PFX T 0 Quell' [AEIOUH]
PFX T a Quell'A a
PFX T e Quell'E e
PFX T i Quell'I i
PFX T o Quell'O o
PFX T u Quell'U u
PFX T h Quell'H h
PFX T 0 QUELL' [AEIOUH][QWERTYUIOPLKJHGFDSAZXCVBNM]

PFX U Y 30
PFX U 0 un' [aeiouhAEIOUH]
PFX U a un'A a
PFX U e un'E e
PFX U i un'I i
PFX U o un'O o
PFX U u un'U u
PFX U h un'H h
PFX U 0 Un' [AEIOUH]
PFX U a Un'A a
PFX U e Un'E e
PFX U i Un'I i
PFX U o Un'O o
PFX U u Un'U u
PFX U h Un'H h
PFX U 0 UN' [AEIOUH][QWERTYUIOPLKJHGFDSAZXCVBNM]
PFX U 0 ciascun' [aeiouhAEIOUH]
PFX U a ciascun'A a
PFX U e ciascun'E e
PFX U i ciascun'I i
PFX U o ciascun'O o
PFX U u ciascun'U u
PFX U h ciascun'H h
PFX U 0 Ciascun' [AEIOUH]
PFX U a Ciascun'A a
PFX U e Ciascun'E e
PFX U i Ciascun'I i
PFX U o Ciascun'O o
PFX U u Ciascun'U u
PFX U h Ciascun'H h
PFX U 0 CIASCUN' [AEIOUH][QWERTYUIOPLKJHGFDSAZXCVBNM]

PFX X Y 72
PFX X 0 m' [aeiouAEIOU]
PFX X a m'A a
PFX X e m'E e
PFX X i m'I i
PFX X o m'O o
PFX X u m'U u
PFX X 0 M' [AEIOU]
PFX X a M'A a
PFX X e M'E e
PFX X i M'I i
PFX X o M'O o
PFX X u M'U u
PFX X 0 t' [aeiouAEIOU]
PFX X a t'A a
PFX X e t'E e
PFX X i t'I i
PFX X o t'O o
PFX X u t'U u
PFX X 0 T' [AEIOU]
PFX X a T'A a
PFX X e T'E e
PFX X i T'I i
PFX X o T'O o
PFX X u T'U u
PFX X 0 s' [aeiouAEIOU]
PFX X a s'A a
PFX X e s'E e
PFX X i s'I i
PFX X o s'O o
PFX X u s'U u
PFX X 0 S' [AEIOU]
PFX X a S'A a
PFX X e S'E e
PFX X i S'I i
PFX X o S'O o
PFX X u S'U u
PFX X 0 c' [aeiouAEIOU]
PFX X a c'A a
PFX X e c'E e
PFX X i c'I i
PFX X o c'O o
PFX X u c'U u
PFX X 0 C' [AEIOU]
PFX X a C'A a
PFX X e C'E e
PFX X i C'I i
PFX X o C'O o
PFX X u C'U u
PFX X 0 v' [aeiouAEIOU]
PFX X a v'A a
PFX X e v'E e
PFX X i v'I i
PFX X o v'O o
PFX X u v'U u
PFX X 0 V' [AEIOU]
PFX X a V'A a
PFX X e V'E e
PFX X i V'I i
PFX X o V'O o
PFX X u V'U u
PFX X 0 n' [aeiouAEIOU]
PFX X a n'A a
PFX X e n'E e
PFX X i n'I i
PFX X o n'O o
PFX X u n'U u
PFX X 0 N' [AEIOU]
PFX X a N'A a
PFX X e N'E e
PFX X i N'I i
PFX X o N'O o
PFX X u N'U u

SFX Y N 14
SFX Y o emente [lu]ento
SFX Y o amente [^t]o
SFX Y o amente [^n]to
SFX Y o amente [^e]nto
SFX Y o amente [^lu]ento
SFX Y 0 mente [^rl]e
SFX Y e mente [aeiou]re
SFX Y 0 mente [^aeiou]re
SFX Y e mente [^l]le
SFX Y 0 mente lle
SFX Y e issimamente [^i]e
SFX Y o issimamente [^i]o
SFX Y e ssimamente ie
SFX Y o ssimamente io

SFX W Y 20
SFX W o issimo [^igc]o
SFX W o issimi [^igc]o
SFX W e issimo [^r]e
SFX W e issimi [^r]e
SFX W o issima [^igc]o
SFX W o issime [^igc]o
SFX W e issima [^r]e
SFX W e issime [^r]e
SFX W o ssimo io
SFX W o ssimi io
SFX W o ssima io
SFX W o ssime io
SFX W re errimo re
SFX W re errimi re
SFX W re errima re
SFX W re errime re
SFX W o hissimo [cg]o
SFX W o hissima [cg]o
SFX W o hissime [cg]o
SFX W o hissimi [cg]o

SFX N Y 12
SFX N a ina [^icg]a
SFX N a ine [^icg]a
SFX N a hina [cg]a
SFX N a hine [cg]a
SFX N a hetta [cg]a
SFX N a hette [cg]a
SFX N a etta [^cg]a
SFX N a ette [^cg]a
SFX N a na ia
SFX N a ne ia
SFX N a ona a
SFX N a one a

PFX J Y 1
PFX J 0 ri .

SFX V Y 117 # verbi in -rre (-urre -> -uco | -orre -> -ongo | -arre -> aggo)
SFX V rre ca urre
SFX V rre cano urre
SFX V rre ce urre
SFX V rre cemmo urre
SFX V rre cente urre
SFX V rre centi urre
SFX V rre cesse urre
SFX V rre cessero urre
SFX V rre cessi urre
SFX V rre cessimo urre
SFX V rre ceste urre
SFX V rre cesti urre
SFX V rre cete urre
SFX V rre ceva urre
SFX V rre cevamo urre
SFX V rre cevano urre
SFX V rre cevate urre
SFX V rre cevi urre
SFX V rre cevo urre
SFX V rre ci urre
SFX V rre ciamo urre
SFX V rre ciate urre
SFX V rre co urre
SFX V rre cono urre
SFX V e à urre
SFX V e ai urre
SFX V e anno urre
SFX V e ò urre
SFX V 0 bbe urre
SFX V 0 bbero urre
SFX V 0 i urre
SFX V 0 mmo urre
SFX V 0 mo urre
SFX V 0 ste urre
SFX V 0 sti urre
SFX V 0 te urre
SFX V rre sse urre
SFX V rre ssero urre
SFX V rre ssi urre
SFX V rre ne orre
SFX V rre nemmo orre
SFX V rre nente orre
SFX V rre nenti orre
SFX V rre nesse orre
SFX V rre nessero orre
SFX V rre nessi orre
SFX V rre nessimo orre
SFX V rre neste orre
SFX V rre nesti orre
SFX V rre nete orre
SFX V rre neva orre
SFX V rre nevamo orre
SFX V rre nevano orre
SFX V rre nevate orre
SFX V rre nevi orre
SFX V rre nevo orre
SFX V rre nga orre
SFX V rre ngano orre
SFX V rre ngo orre
SFX V rre ngono orre
SFX V rre ni orre
SFX V rre niamo orre
SFX V rre niate orre
SFX V e à orre
SFX V e ai orre
SFX V e anno orre
SFX V e ò orre
SFX V 0 bbe orre
SFX V 0 bbero orre
SFX V 0 i orre
SFX V 0 mmo orre
SFX V 0 mo orre
SFX V 0 ste orre
SFX V 0 sti orre
SFX V 0 te orre
SFX V rre se orre
SFX V rre sero orre
SFX V rre si orre
SFX V rre e arre
SFX V rre emmo arre
SFX V rre ente arre
SFX V rre enti arre
SFX V rre esse arre
SFX V rre essero arre
SFX V rre essi arre
SFX V rre essimo arre
SFX V rre este arre
SFX V rre esti arre
SFX V rre ete arre
SFX V rre eva arre
SFX V rre evamo arre
SFX V rre evano arre
SFX V rre evate arre
SFX V rre evi arre
SFX V rre evo arre
SFX V rre gga arre
SFX V rre ggano arre
SFX V rre ggo arre
SFX V rre ggono arre
SFX V rre i arre
SFX V rre iamo arre
SFX V rre iate arre
SFX V e à arre
SFX V e ai arre
SFX V e anno arre
SFX V e ò arre
SFX V 0 bbe arre
SFX V 0 bbero arre
SFX V 0 i arre
SFX V 0 mmo arre
SFX V 0 mo arre
SFX V 0 ste arre
SFX V 0 sti arre
SFX V 0 te arre
SFX V rre sse arre
SFX V rre ssero arre
SFX V rre ssi arre
