motorola-external-hunspell/motorola/external/hunspell/dicts/it_IT/it_IT.dic
abbracciare/ATXI
accalorare/ATXI
accapezzatura/QTUqs
accentuativa/QTU
acchitare/ATXI
accontentare/ATXI
accusare/ATXI
aconfessionale/STUqrs
adacquare/ATXI
addestrando/DJ
addurre/VTXjI
adenina/QTUqs
adulterare/ATXqrI
aerofotogrammetria/QTUqrs
affettuoso/OTWYq
affezionato/FTUYqrs
affittire/CTXqrI
Afrodite/TUqrs
aggirabile/STU
aggradava/X
Alcino/T^
Alcione/TUqrs
alettare/ATXqrI
allungare/ATXqrJI
alma/QTUqrs
altezza/QTUqrs
ammattonante/Us
ammogliato/JFTUqrs
ammutoliscano/Tqr
anatomizzare/ATXqrI
andavamo/JTX
andrò/JTX
anemografia/QTUqrs
Anita/T^
antecedente/TYqr
anteporre/VTjI
anticancerosa/QTUqrs
antiquato/OTYW
antischiavismo/OTqr
apirena/QTUqs
appacificare/ATXqrI
appiccicaticcia/nTUqrs
apporre/VTjI
appropriabile/STU
arcaizzare/ATXI
ardesiaca/QRTUqrs
argentante/Us
arruvidisce/TUqrs
asfaltare/ATXqJI
assemblea/QTUqrs
asseverativo/OTqr
assonnato/OTY
asta/QRTUNqrs
astrarre/VTjI
astucciaia/QTUqrs
astuto/OTYWq
attaccabottoni/Tqr
attenere/BTXqrI
attrarre/VJTjI
audace/SWYTU
autocora/QTUqrs
automorfa/QTUqrs
autoridurre/VTjI
avrebbero/TXJ
avremo/TXJ
avvalorato/FTUqrs
avvizzisce/TUqrs
azzuffato/JFTUqrs
banale/SYW
basso/oYW
battuta/QN
beccamosca/QN
bellicoso/oYW
benedicevi/edJ
benediremmo/edJ
benedivo/edJ
berlicca/QN
bestiola/QN
borghese/SYW
branda/QN
briscola/QN
buono/oYW
cagna/QN
caldera/QN
canaglia/QN
cantonata/QN
carino/oYW
catena/QN
cella/QN
chiocciola/QN
cinematografico/pY
circondurre/VjI
classificato/FJ
coattivo/oYW
comparendo/JE
comporre/VJjI
condurre/VJjI
congruo/oYW
conscio/OeY
consultare/AJI
contraddiceva/edJ
contraddire/edJI
contrapporre/VjI
convalidando/DJ
cravatta/QN
credibile/SYW
cristallizzare/AJI
cronachistico/pY
cucina/QN
decomporre/VjI
dedurre/VjI
deperibile/SYW
detrarre/VjI
dicci/eJ
diciate/edJ
difilato/oY
direste/eJ
disabitato/oW
disdicessi/edJ
disdirai/edJ
dispiegando/DJ
distrarre/VjI
disumano/oYW
diverso/oYW
domanda/QN
eccolo/oJ
edificare/ATXqrI
edile/STUqrs
effe/TUq
elegante/STUYWqrs
elmintiasi/Tqr
ematogena/QTU
embrionale/SYTU
entalpia/QTUqrs
ergativo/OT
eritrite/STUqs
eruppe/TXqr
esitazione/STUqrs
estetico/TYq
estrarre/VJjI
estrazione/STUqrs
esultare/ATXqrI
eterizzazione/STU
eventuale/STUYWq
fatto/mJ
fedele/SWY
feticistico/pY
fluido/oYW
fontana/QN
frapporre/VjI
freudiano/oY
frugale/SYW
glorioso/oYW
godibile/SYW
ibera/QTUqrs
idea/QTUNqrs
Ifigenia/TUqrs
illibatissimo/OT
imboscare/ATXqrI
immacolato/OTYW
immemorabile/SYTU
immunosiero/OTqr
impancare/ATXqrI
impedibile/STU
implodere/BTXqrI
imporre/VTXjI
impostato/FTUqrs
impudente/STUYWq
inapplicata/QTUNqrs
inapplicato/OTWqr
inattenzione/STU
incalorire/tvTXqrI
incapacità/TU
inchiavardare/ATXqrI
inconfondibile/SYTU
incontrovertibilità/TUqs
increbbe/TUqrs
indelicato/OTYW
indice/edXiT
indimostrabile/SYTU
indurre/VTjI
infarcire/tvTXI
infelice/STUYWq
infiammatoria/QTUqrs
inframmischiare/ATXqrI
infrascare/ATXqrI
inghiottiscigliene/J
ingurgitare/ATXqrI
insaccatura/QTUqs
insofferente/STUqsYW
insuperbire/tvTXqrI
intenditore/STqr
intenso/OTYWq
interfacciare/ATXqrI
interossea/QTUqrs
interporre/VjI
intuibile/SYTU
intuire/tvTXqrI
involtura/QTUqrs
iperattiva/QTU
irrigidire/tvTXqrI
irritrattabile/SYTU
isoclinale/STUqrs
israeliana/QTUqrs
lavagna/QN
lento/oW
lineare/SY
maledici/edJb
malformato/oYW
mamma/QN
mansueto/oYW
menzogna/QN
messo/mJ
minestra/QN
misericordioso/oY
mutevole/SYW
nominativo/oY
oligopolista/QRTUqrs
omiletica/QRTUqrs
onorare/ATXqrI
opporre/VjI
organopatia/QTUqrs
ortogonale/STUY
oscillatoria/QTUqrs
ovoidea/QTUqrs
panciuto/oW
partizionato/FJ
pelato/FY
pentola/QN
pipa/QN
pistola/QN
porco/pY
posporre/VjI
pregevole/SYW
preghiera/QN
preporre/VJjI
presentare/AJI
produrre/VJjI
protrarre/VjI
ragazza/QN
relativistico/pY
retrarre/VjI
rintrodurre/VjI
riproducibile/SW
roba/QRN
rondella/QN
scortese/SYW
scrivere/BeJI
sedurre/VjI
seggiola/QN
smoderato/oYW
sottoesporre/VjI
sottrarre/VjI
sovraimporre/VjI
sovresporre/VjI
spasmodico/pY
spudorato/oYW
stufa/QN
supporre/VjI
temporario/oY
tradurre/VjI
trasdurre/VjI
trasmesso/mJ
tremendo/oYW
ubbidisce/TX
uniformazione/STUqrs
veritiero/oY
vezzoso/oYW
visita/QN
vogato/FJ
